Connecticut, session 2026, HB05150.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Administrative
2 Services, having reviewed applications for state grants for public school
3 building projects in accordance with section 10-283 of the general
4 statutes on the basis of priorities for such projects and standards for
5 school construction established by the State Board of Education, and
6 having prepared a listing of all such eligible projects ranked in order of
7 priority, as determined by said commissioner together with the amount
8 of the estimated grant with respect to each eligible project, and having
9 submitted such listing of eligible projects, prior to December 15, 2025, to
10 a committee of the General Assembly established under section 10-283a
11 of the general statutes for the purpose of reviewing such listing, is
12 hereby authorized to enter into grant commitments on behalf of the state
13 in accordance with said section 10-283a with respect to the priority
14 listing of such projects and in such estimated amounts as approved by
sHB5150 / File No. 10 1

sHB5150 File No. 10
15 said committee prior to February 1, 2026, as follows:
T1 School District Estimated Estimated
T2 School Project Costs Grant
T3 Project Number
T4
T5 MILFORD
T6 Jonathan Law High School
T7 084-0217 EA $12,650,000 $4,968,920
T8
T9 NORWICH
T10 Teachers' Memorial Global Studies
T11 Magnet Middle School
T12 104-0122 N $69,367,713 $55,494,170
T13
T14 SEYMOUR
T15 Bungay Elementary School
T16 124-0058 N $60,000,000 $38,748,000
T17
T18 STAMFORD
T19 Julia Stark Elementary School
T20 135-0294 A/EC $14,347,081 $8,608,249
T21
T22 WATERBURY
T23 Roberto Clemente International Dual
T24 Language School
T25 151-0318 EA $38,755,850 $30,589,992
T26
T27 WESTPORT
T28 Long Lots Elementary School
T29 158-0101 N $110,472,124 $12,229,264
16 Sec. 2. Section 10-285a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
17 is amended by adding subsection (m) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
18 (NEW) (m) On and after July 1, 2026, if the student enrollment of a
19 school district has increased by twenty per cent or more over the ten-
20 year period immediately preceding the date an application is submitted
21 pursuant to section 10-283, the reimbursement percentage of the town
22 of such school district shall be increased by twenty percentage points,
sHB5150 / File No. 10 2

sHB5150 File No. 10
23 provided such increase shall not result in a reimbursement percentage
24 exceeding one hundred per cent.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 10-285a(m)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2, "of the 2026 supplement" was added in the leading
language for consistency with standard drafting conventions.
ED Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5150 / File No. 10 3

sHB5150 File No. 10
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Treasurer, Debt Serv. GF - Future Cost See Below See Below
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities Future See Below See Below
Revenue
Gain
Explanation
The bill approves a net increase of $151 million in state grant
commitments for school construction projects, which represents
potential revenue gain for the specified municipalities. The grants-in-
aid will be financed through the issuance of General Obligation (GO)
bonds in future fiscal years. The bill does not authorize new GO bonds.
The projected debt service cost to the General Fund to issue $151 million
of GO bonds at current market rates is $230 million over 20 years.
The bill also increases the reimbursement rate by 20 percentage
points for school construction projects in districts where student
enrollment has increased by 20 percent or more over the ten years prior
to project application. To the extent future projects are found to be
eligible for the reimbursement increase and relevant projects are
proposed, approved, and completed, there would be increased costs to
the state and increased revenue to involved municipalities. The impact
of the increased reimbursements for future projects on the school
sHB5150 / File No. 10 4

sHB5150 File No. 10
construction priority list will be reflected when such projects are
considered by the legislature in the future.
The Out Years
The ongoing fiscal impact identified above will continue into the
future subject to project completion, successful application for
reimbursement, and the costs of borrowing.
sHB5150 / File No. 10 5

sHB5150 File No. 10
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5150
AN ACT CONCERNING AUTHORIZATION OF STATE GRANT
COMMITMENTS FOR SCHOOL BUILDING PROJECTS AND
REVISIONS TO THE SCHOOL BUILDING PROJECT STATUTES.